Massachusetts, session 194th, H3943.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “on”, in line 1, the following
word:- Saturday,.
SECTION 2. Section 25B of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 216, the word “seventeenth” and inserting in place thereof the
following word:- tenth.
of 1